Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.172

When review procedure may be dispensed with.

Whenever a petition is filed as provided in RCW 35.13.020 or a resolution is adopted by the city or town council, as provided in RCW 35.13.015, and the area proposed for annexation is less than ten acres and less than eight hundred thousand dollars in assessed valuation, such review procedures shall be dispensed with.

[ 1981 c 260 s 6. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 14; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 15; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.172; prior: 1961 c 282 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.